California statutes. Penal Code
(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “campus community” means those persons present at, and those persons regularly frequenting, any place associated with an institution of higher education, including campuses; administrative and educational offices; laboratories; satellite facilities owned or utilized by the institution for educational instruction, business, or institutional events; and public areas contiguous to any campus or facility that are regularly frequented by students, employees, or volunteers of the campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 32.   Effective October 13, 2007.   Note: Sections 290.010 to 290.019 precede this section and follow Section 290.009.)
-------------------------------------------

290.02.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice shall identify the names of persons required to register pursuant to Section 290 from a list of persons provided by the requesting agency, and provide those names and other information necessary to verify proper identification, to any state governmental entity responsible for authorizing or providing publicly funded prescription drugs or other therapies to treat erectile dysfunction of those persons. State governmental entities shall use information received pursuant to this section to protect public safety by preventing the use of prescription drugs or other therapies to treat erectile dysfunction by convicted sex offenders.

(b) Use or disclosure of the information disclosed pursuant to this section is prohibited for any purpose other than that authorized by this section or Section 14133.225 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The Department of Justice may establish a fee for requests, including all actual and reasonable costs associated with the service.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any state governmental entity that is responsible for authorizing or providing publicly funded prescription drugs or other therapies to treat erectile dysfunction may use the sex offender database authorized by Section 290.46 to protect public safety by preventing the use of those drugs or therapies for convicted sex offenders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Note: Sections 290.020 to 290.024 precede Section 290.01 and follow Section 290.019.)
-------------------------------------------

290.03.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a comprehensive system of risk assessment, supervision, monitoring and containment for registered sex offenders residing in California communities is necessary to enhance public safety and reduce the risk of recidivism posed by these offenders. The Legislature further affirms and incorporates the following findings and declarations, previously reflected in its enactment of “Megan’s Law”:

(1) Sex offenders pose a potentially high risk of committing further sex offenses after release from incarceration or commitment, and the protection of the public from reoffending by these offenders is a paramount public interest.

(2) It is a compelling and necessary public interest that the public have information concerning persons convicted of offenses involving unlawful sexual behavior collected pursuant to Sections 290 and 290.4 to allow members of the public to adequately protect themselves and their children from these persons.

(3) Persons convicted of these offenses involving unlawful sexual behavior have a reduced expectation of privacy because of the public’s interest in public safety.

(4) In balancing the offenders’ due process and other rights against the interests of public security, the Legislature finds that releasing information about sex offenders under the circumstances specified in the Sex Offender Punishment, Control, and Containment Act of 2006 will further the primary government interest of protecting vulnerable populations from potential harm.

(5) The registration of sex offenders, the public release of specified information about certain sex offenders pursuant to Sections 290 and 290.4, and public notice of the presence of certain high risk sex offenders in communities will further the governmental interests of public safety and public scrutiny of the criminal and mental health systems that deal with these offenders.

(6) To protect the safety and general welfare of the people of this state, it is necessary to provide for continued registration of sex offenders, for the public release of specified information regarding certain more serious sex offenders, and for community notification regarding high risk sex offenders who are about to be released from custody or who already reside in communities in this state. This policy of authorizing the release of necessary and relevant information about serious and high risk sex offenders to members of the general public is a means of assuring public protection and shall not be construed as punitive.

(7) The Legislature also declares, however, that in making information available about certain sex offenders to the public, it does not intend that the information be used to inflict retribution or additional punishment on any person convicted of a sex offense. While the Legislature is aware of the possibility of misuse, it finds that the dangers to the public of nondisclosure far outweigh the risk of possible misuse of the information. The Legislature is further aware of studies in Oregon and Washington indicating that community notification laws and public release of similar information in those states have resulted in little criminal misuse of the information and that the enhancement to public safety has been significant.

(b) In enacting the Sex Offender Punishment, Control, and Containment Act of 2006, the Legislature hereby creates a standardized, statewide system to identify, assess, monitor and contain known sex offenders for the purpose of reducing the risk of recidivism posed by these offenders, thereby protecting victims and potential victims from future harm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 337, Sec. 12.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

290.04.

(a) (1) The sex offender risk assessment tools authorized by this section for use with selected populations shall be known, with respect to each population, as the State-Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders (SARATSO). If a SARATSO has not been selected for a given population pursuant to this section, no duty to administer the SARATSO elsewhere in this code shall apply with respect to that population. Every person required to register as a sex offender shall be subject to assessment with the SARATSO as set forth in this section and elsewhere in this code.

(2) A representative of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in consultation with a representative of the State Department
 of State Hospitals and a representative of the Attorney General’s office, shall comprise the SARATSO Review Committee. The purpose of the committee, which shall be staffed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall be to ensure that the SARATSO reflects the most reliable, objective, and well-established protocols for predicting sex offender risk of recidivism, has been scientifically validated and cross validated, and is, or is reasonably likely to be, widely accepted by the courts. The committee shall consult with experts in the fields of risk assessment and the use of actuarial instruments in predicting sex offender risk, sex offending, sex offender treatment, mental health, and law, as it deems appropriate.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2007, the SARATSO for adult males required to register as sex offenders shall be the STATIC-99 risk assessment scale, which shall be the SARATSO static tool for adult
 males.

(2) The SARATSO Review Committee shall determine whether the STATIC-99 should be supplemented with an empirically derived instrument that measures dynamic risk factors or whether the STATIC-99 should be replaced as the SARATSO with a different risk assessment tool. The SARATSO Review Committee shall select an empirically derived instrument that measures dynamic risk factors and an empirically derived instrument that measures risk of future violence. The selected instruments shall be the SARATSO dynamic tool for adult males and the SARATSO future violence tool for adult males. If the committee unanimously agrees on changes to be made to a designated SARATSO, it shall advise the Governor and the Legislature of the changes, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall post the decision on its Internet Web site. Sixty days after the decision is posted, the selected tool shall become the SARATSO for adult males.

(c) On or before July 1, 2007, the SARATSO Review Committee shall research risk assessment tools for adult females required to register as sex offenders. If the committee unanimously agrees on an appropriate risk assessment tool to be used to assess this population, it shall advise the Governor and the Legislature of the selected tool, and the State Department of Mental Health shall post the decision on its Internet Web site. Sixty days after the decision is posted, the selected tool shall become the SARATSO for adult females.

(d) On or before July 1, 2007, the SARATSO Review Committee shall research risk assessment tools for male juveniles required to register as sex offenders. If the committee unanimously agrees on an appropriate risk assessment tool to be used to assess this population, it shall advise the Governor and the Legislature of the selected tool, and the State Department
 of Mental Health shall post the decision on its Internet Web site. Sixty days after the decision is posted, the selected tool shall become the SARATSO for male juveniles.

(e) On or before July 1, 2007, the SARATSO Review Committee shall research risk assessment tools for female juveniles required to register as sex offenders. If the committee unanimously agrees on an appropriate risk assessment tool to be used to assess this population, it shall advise the Governor and the Legislature of the selected tool, and the State Department of Mental Health shall post the decision on its Internet Web site. Sixty days after the decision is posted, the selected tool shall become the SARATSO for female juveniles.

(f) The committee shall periodically evaluate the SARATSO static, dynamic, and risk of future violence tools for each specified population. If the committee unanimously agrees on a
 change to the SARATSO for any population, it shall advise the Governor and the Legislature of the selected tool, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall post the decision on its Internet Web site. Sixty days after the decision is posted, the selected tool shall become the SARATSO for that population.

(g) The committee shall perform other functions consistent with the provisions of this act or as may be otherwise required by law, including, but not limited to, defining tiers of risk based on the SARATSO. The committee shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 15.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

290.05.

(a) The SARATSO Training Committee shall be comprised of a representative of the State Department of State Hospitals, a representative of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a representative of the Attorney General’s Office, and a representative of the Chief Probation Officers of California.

(b) On or before January 1, 2008, the SARATSO Training Committee, in consultation with the Corrections Standards Authority and the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, shall develop a training program for persons authorized by this code to administer the static SARATSO, as set forth in Section 290.04.

(c) (1) The
 Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be responsible for overseeing the training of persons who will administer the static SARATSO pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 290.06.

(2) The State Department of State Hospitals shall be responsible for overseeing the training of persons who will administer the static SARATSO pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 290.06.

(3) The Correction Standards Authority shall be responsible for developing standards for the training of persons who will administer the static SARATSO pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 290.06.

(4) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall be responsible for developing standards for the training of persons who will administer the static SARATSO pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 290.06.

(d) The training shall be conducted by experts in the field of risk assessment and the use of actuarial instruments in predicting sex offender risk. Subject to requirements established by the committee, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the State Department of State Hospitals, probation departments, and authorized local law enforcement agencies shall designate key persons within their organizations to attend training and, as authorized by the department, to train others within their organizations designated to perform risk assessments as required or authorized by law. Any person who administers the static SARATSO shall receive training no less frequently than every two years.

(e) If the agency responsible for scoring the static SARATSO believes an individual score does not represent the person’s true risk level, based on factors
 in the offender’s record, the agency may submit the case to the experts retained by the SARATSO Review Committee to monitor the scoring of the SARATSO. Those experts shall be guided by empirical research in determining whether to raise or lower the risk level. Agencies that score the static SARATSO shall develop a protocol for submission of risk level override requests to the experts retained in accordance with this subdivision.

(f) The static SARATSO may be performed for purposes authorized by statute only by persons trained pursuant to this section. Persons who administer the dynamic SARATSO and the future violence SARATSO shall be trained to administer the dynamic and future violence SARATSO tools as required in Section 290.09. Probation officers or parole agents may be trained by SARATSO experts on the dynamic SARATSO tool and perform assessments on that tool only if authorized by the SARATSO Training Committee to do so after successful
 completion of training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 16.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

290.06.

The static SARATSO, as set forth in Section 290.04, shall be administered as follows:

(a) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall assess every eligible person who is incarcerated in state prison. Whenever possible, the assessment shall take place at least four months, but no sooner than 10 months, prior to release from incarceration.

(2) The department shall assess every eligible person who is on parole if the person was not assessed prior to release from state prison. Whenever possible, the assessment shall take place at least four months, but no sooner than 10 months, prior to termination of parole. The department shall record in a
 database the risk assessment scores of persons assessed pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (1), and any risk assessment score that was submitted to the department by a probation officer pursuant to Section 1203.

(3) The department shall assess every person on parole transferred from any other state or by the federal government to this state who has been, or is hereafter convicted in any other court, including any state, federal, or military court, of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses described in subdivision (c) of Section 290. The assessment required by this paragraph shall occur no later than 60 days after a determination by the Department of Justice that the person is required to register as a sex offender in California pursuant to Section 290.005.

(4) The State Department of State
 Hospitals shall assess every eligible person who is committed to that department. Whenever possible, the assessment shall take place at least four months, but no sooner than 10 months, prior to release from commitment. The State Department of State Hospitals shall record in a database the risk assessment scores of persons assessed pursuant to this paragraph and any risk assessment score that was submitted to the department by a probation officer pursuant to Section 1203.

(5) Commencing January 1, 2010, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the State Department of State Hospitals shall send the scores obtained in accordance with paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) to the Department of Justice not later than 30 days after the date of the assessment. The risk assessment score of an offender shall be made part of his or her file maintained by the Department of Justice as soon as possible without financial impact, but no later than January
 1, 2012.

(6) Each probation department shall, prior to sentencing, assess every eligible person as defined in subdivision (c), whether or not a report is prepared pursuant to Section 1203.

(7) Each probation department shall assess every eligible person under its supervision who was not assessed pursuant to paragraph (6). The assessment shall take place prior to the termination of probation, but no later than January 1, 2010.

(b) Eligible persons not assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) may be assessed as follows:

(1) Upon request of the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the person is registered pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.023, inclusive, the person shall be assessed. The law enforcement agency may enter into a memorandum of
 understanding with a probation department to perform the assessment. In the alternative, the law enforcement agency may arrange to have personnel trained to perform the risk assessment in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 290.05.

(2) Eligible persons not assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) may request that a risk assessment be performed. A request form shall be available at registering law enforcement agencies. The person requesting the assessment shall pay a fee for the assessment that shall be sufficient to cover the cost of the assessment. The risk assessment so requested shall be performed either by the probation department, if a memorandum of understanding is established between the law enforcement agency and the probation department, or by personnel who have been trained to perform risk assessment in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 290.05.

(c) For
 purposes of this section, “eligible person” means a person who was convicted of an offense that requires him or her to register as a sex offender pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act and who is eligible for assessment, pursuant to the official Coding Rules designated for use with the risk assessment instrument by the author of any risk assessment instrument (SARATSO) selected by the SARATSO Review Committee.

(d) Persons authorized to perform risk assessments pursuant to this section, Section 1203, and Section 706 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

290.07.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person authorized by statute to administer the State Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders (SARATSO) and trained pursuant to Section 290.06 or 290.09, and a person acting under authority from the SARATSO Review Committee as an expert to train, monitor, or review scoring by persons who administer the SARATSO pursuant to Section 290.05 or 1203 of this code or Section 706 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be granted access to all relevant records pertaining to a registered sex offender, including, but not limited to, criminal histories, sex offender registration records, police reports, probation and presentencing reports, judicial records and case files, juvenile records, psychological
 evaluations and psychiatric hospital reports, sexually violent predator treatment program reports, and records that have been sealed by the courts or the Department of Justice. Records and information obtained under this section shall not be subject to the California Public Records Act, Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 332.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

290.08.

Every district attorney’s office and the Department of Justice shall retain records relating to a person convicted of an offense for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290 for a period of 75 years after disposition of the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 337, Sec. 17.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

290.09.

On or before July 2012, the SARATSO dynamic tool and the SARATSO future violence tool, as set forth in Section 290.04, shall be administered as follows:

(a) (1) Every sex offender required to register pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.023, inclusive, shall, while on parole or formal probation, participate in an approved sex offender management program pursuant to Sections 1203.067 and 3008.

(2) The sex offender management program shall meet the certification requirements developed by the California Sex
 Offender Management Board pursuant to Section 9003. Probation departments and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not employ or contract with, and shall not allow a sex offender to employ or contract with, an individual or entity to provide sex offender evaluation or treatment services pursuant to this section unless the sex offender evaluation or treatment services to be provided by the individual or entity conform with the standards developed pursuant to Section 9003.

(b) (1) The sex offender management
 professionals certified by the California Sex Offender Management Board in accordance with Section 9003 who provide sex offender management programs for
 a probation department or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall assess each registered sex offender on formal probation or parole using the SARATSO dynamic tool when a dynamic risk factor changes and shall do a final dynamic assessment within six months of the offender’s release from supervision. The management professional shall also assess the sex offenders in the program with the SARATSO future violence tool.

(2) The certified sex offender management professional shall, as soon as possible but
 not later than 30 days after the assessment, provide the person’s score on the SARATSO dynamic tool and the future violence tool to the person’s parole agent or probation officer. Within 30 days of the assessment, a certified sex offender management professional shall send the score to the Department of Justice using the dynamic and violence risk assessment tool database used by SARATSO. The score shall be accessible to law enforcement through the Department of Justice’s
 internet website for the California Sex and Arson Registry (CSAR).

(c) The certified sex offender management professional shall communicate with the offender’s probation officer or parole agent on a regular basis, but at least once a month, about the offender’s progress in the program and dynamic risk assessment issues and shall share pertinent information with the certified polygraph examiner as required.

(d) The SARATSO Training Committee shall provide annual training on the SARATSO dynamic tool and the SARATSO future violence tool. Certified sex offender management professionals shall attend this training once to obtain authorization to
 perform the
 assessments and thereafter attend training updates as required by the SARATSO Training Committee. If a sex offender management professional is certified pursuant to Section 9003 to conduct an approved sex offender management program prior to attending SARATSO training on the dynamic and violent risk assessment tools, they shall present to the SARATSO Training Committee proof of training on these tools from a risk assessment expert approved by the SARATSO Training Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

290.3.

(a) Every person who is convicted of any offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 290 shall, in addition to any imprisonment or fine, or both, imposed for commission of the underlying offense, be punished by a fine of three hundred dollars ($300) upon the first conviction or a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) upon the second and each subsequent conviction, unless the court determines that the defendant does not have the ability to pay the fine.

An amount equal to all fines collected pursuant to this subdivision during the preceding month upon conviction of, or upon the forfeiture of bail by, any person arrested for, or convicted of, committing an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 290, shall be transferred once a month by the county treasurer to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund. Moneys deposited in the General Fund pursuant to this subdivision shall be transferred by the Controller as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), out of the moneys deposited pursuant to subdivision (a) as a result of second and subsequent convictions of Section 290, one-third shall first be transferred to the Department of Justice Sexual Habitual Offender Fund, as provided in paragraph (1) of this subdivision. Out of the remainder of all moneys deposited pursuant to subdivision (a), 50 percent shall be transferred to the Department of Justice Sexual Habitual Offender Fund, as provided in paragraph (1), 25 percent shall be transferred to the DNA Identification Fund, as established by Section 76104.6 of the Government Code, and 25 percent shall be allocated equally to counties that maintain a local DNA testing laboratory, as provided in paragraph (2).

(1) Those moneys so designated shall be transferred to the Department of Justice Sexual Habitual Offender Fund created pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11170 and, when appropriated by the Legislature, shall be used for the purposes of Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 13885) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 13890) of Title 6 of Part 4 for the purpose of monitoring, apprehending, and prosecuting sexual habitual offenders.

(2) Those moneys so designated shall be allocated equally and distributed quarterly to counties that maintain a local DNA testing laboratory. Before making any allocations under this paragraph, the Controller shall deduct the estimated costs that will be incurred to set up and administer the payment of these funds to the counties. Any funds allocated to a county pursuant to this paragraph shall be used by that county for the exclusive purpose of testing DNA samples for law enforcement purposes.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may collect a fine imposed pursuant to this section from a person convicted of a violation of any offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 290, that results in incarceration in a facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. All moneys collected by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation under this subdivision shall be transferred, once a month, to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund, as provided in subdivision (a), for transfer by the Controller, as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) An amount equal to one-third of every first conviction fine collected and one-fifth of every second conviction fine collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be transferred to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to help defray the cost of the global positioning system used to monitor sex offender parolees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 699, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

290.4.

(a) The department shall operate a service through which members of the public may provide a list of at least six persons on a form approved by the Department of Justice and inquire whether any of those persons is required to register as a sex offender and is subject to public notification. The Department of Justice shall respond with information on any person as to whom information may be available to the public via the Internet Web site as provided in Section 290.46, to the extent that information may be disclosed pursuant to Section 290.46. The Department of Justice may establish a fee for requests, including all actual and reasonable costs associated with the service.

(b) The income from the operation of the service
 specified in subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Sexual Predator Public Information Account within the Department of Justice for the purpose of the implementation of this section by the Department of Justice.

The moneys in the account shall consist of income from the operation of the service authorized by subdivision (a), and any other funds made available to the account by the Legislature. Moneys in the account shall be available to the Department of Justice upon appropriation by the Legislature for the purpose specified in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Any person who uses information disclosed pursuant to this section to commit a felony shall be punished, in addition and consecutive to, any other punishment, by a five-year term of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) Any person who,
 without authorization, uses information disclosed pursuant to this section to commit a misdemeanor shall be subject to, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) (1) A person is authorized to use information disclosed pursuant to this section only to protect a person at risk.

(2) Except as authorized under paragraph (1) or any other provision of law, use of any information that is disclosed pursuant to this section for purposes relating to any of the following is prohibited:

(A) Health insurance.

(B) Insurance.

(C) Loans.

(D) Credit.

(E) Employment.

(F) Education, scholarships, or fellowships.

(G) Housing or accommodations.

(H) Benefits, privileges, or services provided by any business establishment.

(3) This section shall not affect authorized access to, or use of, information pursuant to, among other provisions, Sections 11105 and 11105.3 of this code, Section 226.55 of the Civil Code, Sections 777.5 and 14409.2 of the Financial Code, Sections 1522.01 and 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code.

(4) (A) Any use of
 information disclosed pursuant to this section for purposes other than those provided by paragraph (1) or in violation of paragraph (2) shall make the user liable for the actual damages, and any amount that may be determined by a jury or a court sitting without a jury, not exceeding three times the amount of actual damage, and not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and attorney’s fees, exemplary damages, or a civil penalty not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(B) Whenever there is reasonable cause to believe that any person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of misuse of the service specified in subdivision (a), in violation of paragraph (2), the Attorney General, any district attorney, or city attorney, or any person aggrieved by the misuse of the service is authorized to bring a civil action in the appropriate court requesting preventive relief, including an application for a permanent or
 temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the person or group of persons responsible for the pattern or practice of misuse. The foregoing remedies shall be independent of any other remedies or procedures that may be available to an aggrieved party under other provisions of law, including Part 2 (commencing with Section 43) of Division 1 of the Civil Code.

(e) The Department of Justice and its employees shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this section.

(f) The public notification provisions of this section are applicable to every person described in subdivision (a), without regard to when his or her crimes were committed or his or her duty to register pursuant to Section 290 arose, and to every offense subject to public notification pursuant to Section 290.46, regardless of when it was committed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 319.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

290.45.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in paragraph (2), any designated law enforcement entity may provide information to the public about a person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290, by whatever means the entity deems appropriate, when necessary to ensure the public safety based upon information available to the entity concerning that specific person’s current risk of sexual or violent reoffense, including, but not limited to, the person’s static, dynamic, and violence risk levels on the SARATSO risk tools described in subdivision (f) of Section 290.04.

(2) The law enforcement entity shall
 include, with the disclosure, a statement that the purpose of the release of information is to allow members of the public to protect themselves and their children from sex offenders.

(3) Community notification by way of an Internet Web site shall be governed by Section 290.46, and a designated law enforcement entity may not post on an Internet Web site any information identifying an individual as a person required to register as a sex offender except as provided in that section unless there is a warrant outstanding for that person’s arrest.

(b) Information that may be provided pursuant to subdivision (a) may include, but is not limited to, the offender’s name, known aliases, gender, race, physical description, photograph, date of birth, address, which shall be verified prior to
 publication, description and license plate number of the offender’s vehicles or vehicles the offender is known to drive, type of victim targeted by the offender, relevant parole or probation conditions, crimes resulting in classification under this section, and date of release from confinement, but excluding information that would identify the victim. It shall not include any Internet identifier submitted pursuant to this chapter.

(c) (1) The designated law enforcement entity may authorize persons and entities who receive the information pursuant to this section to disclose information to additional persons only if the entity determines that disclosure to the additional persons will enhance the public safety and identifies the appropriate scope of further disclosure. A law enforcement entity may not authorize any
 disclosure of this information by placing that information on an Internet Web site, and shall not authorize disclosure of Internet identifiers submitted pursuant to this chapter, except as provided in subdivision (h).

(2) A person who receives information from a law enforcement entity pursuant to paragraph (1) may disclose that information only in the manner and to the extent authorized by the law enforcement entity.

(d) (1) A designated law enforcement entity and its employees shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this section.

(2) A public or private educational institution, a day care facility, or a child care custodian described in Section 11165.7, or an employee of
 a public or private educational institution or day care facility which in good faith disseminates information as authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be immune from civil liability.

(e) (1) A person who uses information disclosed pursuant to this section to commit a felony shall be punished, in addition and consecutive to any other punishment, by a five-year term of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) A person who uses information disclosed pursuant to this section to commit a misdemeanor shall be subject to, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(f) For purposes of this section, “designated law enforcement entity” means the Department of Justice, a district attorney, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Juvenile Justice, and every state or local agency expressly authorized by statute to investigate or prosecute law violators.

(g) The public notification provisions of this section are applicable to every person required to register pursuant to Section 290, without regard to when his or her crimes were committed or his or her duty to register pursuant to Section 290 arose, and to each offense described in Section 290, regardless of when it was committed.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated law enforcement entity shall only use an Internet identifier
 submitted pursuant to this chapter, or release that Internet identifier to another law enforcement entity, for the purpose of investigating a sex-related crime, a kidnapping, or human trafficking.

(2) A designated law enforcement entity shall not disclose or authorize persons or entities to disclose an Internet identifier submitted pursuant to this chapter to the public or other persons, except as required by court order.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 541, Sec. 8.   (SB 384)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

290.46.

(a) (1) On or before the dates specified in this section, the Department of Justice shall make available information concerning persons who are required to register pursuant to Section 290 to the public via an internet website as specified in this section. The department shall update the internet website on an ongoing basis. All information identifying the victim by name, birth date, address, or relationship to the registrant shall be excluded from the internet website. The name or address of the person’s employer and the listed person’s criminal history other than the specific crimes for which the person is required to register shall not be included on the internet website. The internet website shall be translated
 into languages other than English as determined by the department.

(2) (A) On or before July 1, 2010, the Department of Justice shall make available to the public, via an internet website as specified in this section, as to any person described in subdivision (b), the following information:

(i) The year of conviction of the person’s most recent offense requiring registration pursuant to Section 290.

(ii) The year the person was released from incarceration for that offense.
